North Carolina, session 2025, HB446.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 23 of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 15A-502.01. Prohibition on disclosing a booking photograph.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Booking photograph. – A photograph or image of an individual who is alleged
to have committed a crime that was taken by law enforcement at the initial
booking.
(2) Publish-for-pay publication. – A publication that requires the payment of a fee
or other consideration in order to remove or delete a booking photograph from
the publication.
(3) Publish-for-pay website. – A website that requires the payment of a fee or
other consideration in order to remove or delete a booking photograph from
the website.
(b) Disclosure. – A law enforcement agency may not knowingly disclose a copy of a
booking photograph of a defendant pretrial to any publish-for-pay publication or publish-for-pay
website. However, nothing in this section shall prohibit a law enforcement agency from posting
a booking photograph on the agency website or mobile application.
(c) Removal. – A publish-for-pay publication or publish-for-pay website shall remove
and destroy a booking photograph of any individual who submits a request for removal and
destruction, as provided in G.S. 15A-152(a1). An entity that seeks to condition removal or
destruction of a booking photograph, on the payment of any fee or other item of value, may
constitute a criminal offense.
(d) Civil Liability. – In addition to any other punishment or penalty available under the
law, failure of a publish-for-pay publication or publish-for-pay website to remove and destroy a
booking photograph in accordance with subsection (c) of this section may result in civil liability
as provided in G.S. 15A-152(c)."
SECTION 2. G.S. 15A-152 reads as rewritten:
"§ 15A-152. Civil liability for dissemination of certain criminal history
information.information and booking photographs of defendant pretrial.
…
*H446-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a1) Duty to Remove and Destroy Booking Photograph. – A publish-for-pay publication
or publish-for-pay website, as defined by G.S. 15A-502.01, shall remove and destroy any
booking photograph within seven business days of receiving notice to remove the booking
photograph if both of the following conditions are met:
(1) There is no criminal conviction related to the arrest that generated the booking
photograph.
(2) The individual submits with the request written documentation that the
criminal charge related to the arrest that generated the booking photograph
resulted in a dismissal, acquittal, expunction, or that the grand jury returned
no true bill on a proposed indictment.
…
(c) Civil Liability. – A private entity subject to the provisions of this section that
disseminates information in violation of this section is liable for any damages that are sustained
as a result of the violation by the person who is the subject of that information. A person who
prevails in an action brought under this section is also entitled to recover court costs and
reasonable attorneys' fees. This subsection does not apply to an entity regulated by and subject
to the civil liability remedies of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1681, et seq.,
or the Gramm Leach-Bliley Act, 15 U.S.C. 6801-6809, et seq.
In addition to any other punishment or penalty available under the law, a publish-for-pay
publication or publish-for-pay website that fails to remove and destroy a booking photograph in
accordance with G.S. 15A-502.01 is liable for any damages that are sustained as a result of the
violation by the person who is the subject of the booking photograph to include, at a minimum,
one hundred dollars ($100.00) per day for each day after the deadline described in subsection
(a1) of this section on which the booking photograph is visible or publicly accessible in the
publish-for-pay publication or the publish-for-pay website. A person who prevails in an action
brought under this section is also entitled to recover court costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.
…."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to each of
the following:
(1) Disclosures of booking photographs by a law enforcement agency occurring
on or after that date.
(2) Requests for removal and destruction submitted on or after that date.
(3) The conditioning of removal or destruction of a booking photograph on the
payment of any fee or other item of value occurring on or after that date.
(4) The failure to remove and destroy a booking photograph in accordance with
G.S. 15A-502.01 occurring on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 446-First Edition